Utah statutes.
53A-1-706.   Purchases of educational technology.

(1) (a)  A school district or college of education shall comply with Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, in purchasing technology, except as otherwise provided in Subsection (1)(b).

(b)  A school district may purchase computers from, and contract for the repair or refurbishing of computers with, the Utah Correctional Industries without going through the bidding or competition procedures outlined in Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code.

(2)  A school district or college of education may purchase technology through cooperative purchasing contracts administered by the state Division of Purchasing or through its own established purchasing program.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

